Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2111.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-3164, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3164. Original applicants; examination A. The department may do any of the following: 1. Examine an applicant for an original driver license. 2. Accept the examination conducted by an authorized third party pursuant to chapter 13 of this title.  Beginning July 1, 2014, the third party must be authorized pursuant to section 28-5101.01 or 28-5101.03. 3. Accept documentation of successful completion of a driver training course approved by the department.  Beginning July 1, 2014, for a class D or G license the documentation must be provided by a third party authorized pursuant to section 28-5101.02. 4. Accept documentation that the applicant has successfully completed education on special performance equipment and medically related driving circumstances.  Beginning July 1, 2014, the documentation must be provided by a third party authorized pursuant to section 28-5101.02. 5. Accept documentation that the applicant has successfully completed driver education lessons provided by an instructor who is certified by the superintendent of public instruction. B. The examination shall include all of the following: 1. A test of the applicant's: (a) Eyesight. (b) Ability to read and understand official traffic control devices. (c) Knowledge of safe driving practices and the traffic laws of this state, including those practices and laws relating to bicycles. (d) Knowledge of the effect of using a portable wireless communication device as defined in section 28-914 or engaging in other actions that could distract a driver on the safe or effective operation of a motor vehicle. (e) Knowledge of motorcycle awareness.  The test shall include at least five questions relating to motorcycle awareness. 2. An actual demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a vehicle or vehicle combination of the type covered by the license classification or endorsement for which the applicant applies. 3. Other physical and mental examinations if the department finds them necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to safely operate a motor vehicle on the highways. C. The department may examine an original applicant for a class M license or a motorcycle endorsement or the department may accept the examination conducted by an authorized third party pursuant to chapter 13, article 1 of this title or documentation of successful completion of a motorcycle training program approved by the department. Beginning July 1, 2014, the documentation of successful completion of a motorcycle training program must be provided by a third party motorcycle driver license training provider authorized pursuant to section 28-5101.02 or a motorcycle training program approved by the department and provided in another state or by the United States military. The department may examine an applicant who has a motorcycle license from another jurisdiction.  This examination shall be the same as for all applicants, except that the department may make modifications it finds necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motorcycle, motor driven cycle or moped on the highways. D. The department shall examine a person who holds a driver license issued by another country and who applies for an initial license in this state as an original applicant, except that the department may waive an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle if the person applies for a class D or G license and appears to meet the department's medical qualifications and if the out-of-state license is not revoked or is not expired for more than one year. E. The department may waive the driving examination for initial applicants for a class M license or a motorcycle endorsement if all of the following conditions exist: 1. The applicant's current license indicates the applicant has been specifically licensed to operate a motorcycle. 2. The applicant appears to meet the department's medical qualifications. 3. The applicant's out-of-state license is not revoked or is not expired for more than one year. END_STATUTE